Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-160
Banks; trust department; amendment of charter; supervision.

The director shall have the power to issue to banks amendments to their charters of authority to transact trust business as defined in the Nebraska Trust Company Act and shall have general supervision and control over such trust department of banks.

Laws 1959, c. 19, § 2, p. 143;

Laws 1961, c. 14, § 5, p. 108;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-1,119;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 60, p. 159;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 10;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 11.

Nebraska Trust Company Act, see section 8-201.01.